Georgia, session 2025_26, HB404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
5 SECTION 1.
6 An Act creating a new charter for the City of Conyers, approved March 16, 1978 (Ga. L.
7 1978, p. 3868), as amended, is amended by adding a new paragraph to Section 1-105 to read
8 as follows:
9 "(c) In addition to all other territory included within the corporate limits of the city, the
10 corporate limits shall specifically include the following described parcels:
11 (1) 1281 Milstead Ave.
12 ALL THAT TRACT OR PARCEL OF LAND LYING AND BEING IN LAND LOT 302
13 OF THE 16TH DISTRICT OF ROCKDALE COUNTY, GEORGIA, AND BEING
14 MORE FULLY AND PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
H. B. 404
- 1 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
15 BEGINNING AT AN IRON PIN ON THE SOUTH SIDE OF MILSTEAD AVENUE
16 (GEORGIA STATE HIGHWAY 20) SAID IRON PIN BEING LOCATED ON THE
17 RIGHT OF WAY OF SAID HIGHWAY 20 AT A POINT 1288.4 FEET
18 NORTHEASTERLY FROM THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE INTERSECTION
19 OF STATE HIGHWAY 20 AND WOODLAND ROAD AS MEASURED ALONG THE
20 SOUTH SIDE OF THE RIGHT OF WAY OF STATE HIGHWAY 20; THENCE
21 NORTH 72 DEGREES 29 SECONDS EAST 128.85 FEET TO A CONCRETE RIGHT
22 OF WAY MARKER; THENCE 70 DEGREES, 02 SECONDS EAST, 171.15 FEET TO
23 AN IRON PIN; THENCE SOUTH 08 DEGREES, 57 SECONDS EAST 300 FEET TO
24 AN IRON PIN; THENCE SOUTH 71 DEGREES 05 SECONDS WEST, 300 FEET TO
25 AN IRON PIN; THENCE NORTH 08 DEGREES 57 SECONDS WEST 300 FEET TO
26 AN IRON PIN AT THE POINT OF BEGINNING.
27 THE ABOVE DESCRIBED PROPERTY IS MORE FULLY AND PARTICULARLY
28 DESCRIBED BY A PLAT PREPARED BY ROBERT M. BUHLER, REGISTERED
29 SURVEYOR NO. 1403, DATED JUNE 24, 1967 AND OF RECORD IN PLAT BOOK
30 D, PAGE 225, CLERK'S OFFICE, ROCKDALE COUNTY, GEORGIA, AND FOR
31 THE PURPOSE OF A MORE COMPLETE AND ACCURATE DESCRIPTION, THE
32 SAID PLAT IS HERE BY REFERENCE INCORPORATED IN AND MADE PART OF
33 THIS DESCRIPTION.
34 (2) 1293 Milstead Ave.
35 All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lot 302 of the 16th District,
36 Rockdale County, Georgia, containing 0.540 acre, as shown on survey for City Ice
37 Delivery Company prepared by Joseph D. Sims, R.L.S., dated March 3, 1975, and more
38 particularly described as follows:
39 BEGINNING at an iron pin on the southerly right-of-way line of State Route 20
40 (Milstead Avenue) located 1588.4 feet northeasterly as measured along said right-of-way
41 line from its intersection with the northeasterly right-of-way line of Woodland Road; run
H. B. 404
- 2 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
42 thence along the southerly right-of-way line of State Route 20 an arc distance of 128.10
43 feet and a bearing and distance of North 68 degrees 00 minutes East 128.00 feet to an iron
44 pin; run thence South 08 degrees 46 minutes East 188.25 feet to an iron pin; run thence
45 South 67 degrees 00 minutes West 128.00 feet to an iron pin; run thence North 08
46 degrees 57 minutes West 190.40 feet to an iron pin on the southerly right-of-way line of
47 State Route 20 and the place or point of beginning.
48 (3) 1295 Milstead Ave., Map and Parcel # 067-0-02-018A
49 All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lot 302 of the 16th District and
50 consisting of 1.32 acres, more or less, of Rockdale County, Georgia. This parcel is further
51 known as 1295 NE Milstead Road parcel #067-0-02-0l8A in the records of the Rockdale
52 County Board of Assessors.
53 (4) 1303 Milstead Ave, Tract Two
54 ALL THAT TRACT or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lot 302 of the 16th
55 District of Rockdale County, City of Conyers, Georgia, containing 1.16 acres, and being
56 more particularly described on survey prepared for Wellbrook Associates, Inc., prepared
57 by Patrick & Associates, Inc., certified by James S. Hull, JR., GRLS #2856, dated April
58 20, 2018, and recorded in Plat Book 38, Page 137, Rockdale County, Georgia records,
59 which survey is incorporated herein by reference and made a part hereof. Said property
60 being known as 1303 Milstead Road, according to the present system of numbering in
61 Rockdale County, Georgia.
62 (5) 1309 Milstead Road, Conyers, Georgia
63 ALL THAT TRACT or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lot 302 of the 16th
64 District of Rockdale County, Georgia, consisting of 1.24 acres and being more
65 particularly shown on a survey for Harry Downs, dated 2/22/02, by Charles O. Wiggins,
66 GRLS No. 2293, and being more particularly described as follows:
H. B. 404
- 3 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
67 BEGINNING at an iron pin set on the southerly right of way of Milstead Rd. (50 foot
68 right of way) being located 92.66 feet easterly of the right of way of Ga. Hwy. 20 (100
69 foot right of way) as measured along the southerly right of way of Milstead Rd.; thence
70 running along said right of way North 85 degrees 18 minutes 55 seconds East 223.67 feet
71 to an iron pin found; thence leaving said right of way and running South 06 degrees 57
72 minutes 53 seconds East 237.54 feet to an iron pin set; thence running South 84 degrees
73 18 minutes 50 seconds West 105.95 feet to a PK nail set; thence continuing along said
74 course 121.85 feet to an iron pin set; thence running North 05 degrees 57 minutes 22
75 seconds West 241.39 feet to an iron pin set on the southerly right of way of Milstead Rd.,
76 being the POINT OF BEGINNING.
77 Said Property being known as 1309 Milstead Road, according to the present system of
78 numbering in Rockdale County, Georgia.
79 (6) 1315 Milstead Rd
80 All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lot 302 of the 16th District of
81 Rockdale County, Georgia, and being more fully and particularly described as follows:
82 Beginning at an iron pin corner located on the South right-of-way of Milstead Road (50
83 foot right-of-way), said iron pin being located 325 feet East from an iron stob at the
84 southeast intersection of the right-of-way of Milstead Road and Georgia Highway #20,
85 as measured along the Southerly right-of-way of Milstead Road; thence North 85° 00'
86 East along the Southerly right of way of Milstead Road 165 feet to iron pin found at
87 corner; thence South 05° 00' East 260 feet to iron pin found at corner; thence South 85°
88 00' West 165 feet to iron pin at corner; thence North 05° 00' West 260 feet to iron pin at
89 the point of beginning, as shown more fully on plat of survey prepared for Dr. W.A.
90 Futch by Robert M. Buhler, Registered Land Surveyor #1403, dated March 15, 1972, and
91 recorded at Plat Book J, Page 492, Rockdale County records.
H. B. 404
- 4 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
92 Less and except: All that tract or parcel of land conveyed to Rockdale County, Georgia
93 described in that certain Right of way Deed, recorded in Deed Book 1369, Page 38,
94 Rockdale County records.
95 (7) 1349 Milstead Road
96 ALL THAT TRACT or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lot 302 of the 16th
97 District, Rockdale County, Georgia, and being more particularly described as follows:
98 BEGINNING at an iron pin on the southerly right-of-way of Milstead Road (50 foot
99 right-of-way), said iron pin being located 607.0 feet from the centerline of Norton Road,
100 as measured in a westerly direction along the southerly right-of-way of Milstead Road;
101 thence running South 10° 42' East 316.00 feet to an iron pin set at corner; thence running
102 South 77° 40' West 152.05 feet to an iron pin set at corner; thence running North 05° 46'
103 West 316.00 feet to an iron pin set at corner on the southerly right-of-way of Milstead
104 Road; thence running along the southerly right-of-way of Milstead Road the following
105 courses and distances, to wit: North 77° 46' East 53.50 feet to an iron pin set; North 76°
106 02' East 71.50 feet to the point of beginning.
107 Said property being shown as 1.0 acres on plat of survey prepared for John Fountain,
108 dated September 20, 1978, prepared by Robert M. Buhler, Ga. R.L.S., recorded at Plat
109 Book M, Page 233, Rockdale County, Georgia records, which plat is by reference
110 incorporated herein and made a part hereof.
111 (8) 1415 Milstead Rd
112 ALL THAT TRACT or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lot 318 of the 16th
113 District of Rockdale County, Georgia, and being more particularly described as follows:
114 BEGINNING at the intersection of the southerly side of the right of way of Milstead
115 Road (apparent 50-foot right of way) and the easterly side of the right of way of Norton
116 Road (apparent 40-foot right of way); thence running along the southerly side of the right
117 of way of said Milstead Road North 77 degrees 47 minutes 42 seconds East a distance of
118 161.91 feet to an ½ inch rebar found; thence leaving said right of way and running south
H. B. 404
- 5 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
119 21 degrees 30 minutes 19 seconds East a distance of 270.93 to ½ inch rebar found; thence
120 running thence South 05 degrees 35 minutes 56 seconds East a distance of 281.97 feet to
121 an iron pin set; thence running North 89 degrees 08 minutes 49 seconds West a distance
122 of 314.29 feet to an iron pin set located on the easterly side of the right of way of said
123 Norton Road; thence running along the easterly side of the right of way of Norton Road
124 the following courses and distances: North 02 degrees 24 minutes 12 seconds East a
125 distance of 228.49 feet to a point; thence continuing North 03 degrees 15 minutes 12
126 seconds East a distance of 145.88 feet to a point; thence continuing North 05 degrees 23
127 minutes 31 seconds East a distance of 120.39 feet to a point located at the POINT OF
128 BEGINNING. Said property being shown as Tract l, containing 3.070 acres, as per
129 survey prepared by Bullard Land Planning, Robert F. Bullard, GRLS #2901, dated
130 August 24, 2009.
131 (9) 1312 Old Covington Highway
132 ALL THAT TRACT OR PARCEL OF LAND lying and being in Land Lot 299, 16th
133 District, Rockdale County, Georgia, and being more particularly described as follows:
134 BEGINNING at a one inch open top pipe on the Northerly right-of-way line of Old
135 Covington Highway (50 foot right-of-way) located 71.85 feet Westerly along said
136 right-of-way line from the Westerly right-of-way line of Georgia Highway 138;
137 THENCE along the Northerly right-of-way line of Old Covington Highway North 80
138 degrees 09 minutes 05 seconds West a distance of 199.97 feet to a ½ inch rebar found;
139 THENCE leaving said right-of-way line, run North 10 degrees 27 minutes 40 seconds
140 East a distance of 135.06 feet to a ½ inch rebar found;
141 THENCE North 11 degrees 19 minutes 29 seconds East a distance of 49.52 feet to a ½
142 inch rebar set on the Southerly right-of-way line of the Georgia Railroad;
143 THENCE along said railroad right-of-way line, South 72 degrees 23 minutes 21 seconds
144 East a distance of 200.53 feet to a ½ inch rebar found;
H. B. 404
- 6 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
145 THENCE leaving said railroad right-of-way line, South 10 degrees 13 minutes 01 second
146 West a distance of 49.61 feet to a railroad spike;
147 THENCE South 72 degrees 26 minutes 16 seconds East a distance of 20.16 feet to a ½
148 inch rebar set;
149 THENCE South 10 degrees 25 minutes 32 seconds West a distance of 105.19 feet to a
150 concrete monument stamped RES1 located on the Northerly right-of-way line of Old
151 Covington Highway (a 50 foot right-of-way);
152 THENCE along said right-of-way line, North 80 degrees 04 minutes 30 seconds West a
153 distance of 20.04 feet to the 1" open top pipe at The Point of Beginning; being 0.834 acre
154 of property comprised of 0.785 acre under Tax Parcel No. 72-1-12 and 0.049 acre under
155 Tax Parcel No. 72-1-13, as depicted on that certain survey dated March 18, 2005,
156 prepared and certified by Paul R. Rogers, GRLS No. 2303 of Rhodes Engineering
157 Services, Inc. to Crown Ventures Enterprises, Inc., First American Title Insurance
158 Company, Georgia Certified Development Corporation, the U. S. Small Business
159 Administration and The Peoples Bank.
160 The within and foregoing described property being one and the same as conveyed by (1)
161 Warranty Deed dated June 27, 2002 from K&R Ventures, Inc. to Crown Ventures
162 Enterprises, Inc., recorded in Deed Book 2356, Page 32, Rockdale County, Georgia
163 records, and (2) Quitclaim Deed dated August 10, 2004, from Rockdale County, Georgia
164 to Crown Ventures Enterprises, Inc. recorded in Deed Book 3198, Page 81, aforesaid
165 records.
166 (10) 1328 Old Covington Highway
167 ALL THAT TRACT OR PARCEL OF LAND LYING AND BEING IN LAND LOT 299
168 OF THE 16th DISTRICT, ROCKDALE COUNTY, GEORGIA, AND BEING MORE
169 PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS: BEGINNING AT AN IRON PIN SET
170 ON THE NORTH SIDE OF THE RIGHT OF WAY OF OLD COVINGTON
171 HIGHWAY WHERE IT INTERSECTS WITH THE WEST SIDE OF THE RIGHT OF
H. B. 404
- 7 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
172 WAY OF GEORGIA HIGHWAY 138; THENCE NORTH 81 DEGREES 00 MINUTES
173 WEST AND WITH THE NORTH SIDE OF THE RIGHT OF WAY OF SAID OLD
174 COVINGTON HIGHWAY 111.0 FEET TO A POST; THENCE NORTH 20 DEGREES
175 08 MINUTES EAST 107.0 FEET TO AN IRON PIN LOCATED ON THE SOUTH
176 SIDE OF THE RIGHT OF WAY OF GEORGIA RAILROAD; THENCE SOUTH 72
177 DEGREES 35 MINUTES EAST AND WITH THE SOUTHERN SIDE OF THE RIGHT
178 OF WAY OF SAID GEORGIA RAILROAD 139.3 FEET TO A RIGHT OF WAY
179 MARKER ON THE WEST SIDE OF THE RIGHT OF WAY OF SAID GEORGIA
180 HIGHWAY 138; THENCE SOUTH 38 DEGREES 19 MINUTES WEST AND WITH
181 THE WEST SIDE OF THE RIGHT OF WAY OF SAID GEORGIA HIGHWAY 138 A
182 DISTANCE OF 97.0 FEET TO AN IRON PIN AND THE POINT OF BEGINNING.
183 LESS AND EXCEPT:
184 LESS AND EXCEPT THAT PORTION OF THE ABOVE DESCRIBED PROPERTY
185 CONVEYED UNDER THE NOTICE OF FILING OF DECLARATION OF TAKING
186 BY DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION, CIVIL ACTION NO. 97-CV-2839V,
187 ROCKDALE COUNTY, GEORGIA SUPERIOR COURT, RECORDED ON
188 DECEMBER 29, 1997, AT 3:50 P.M., AT DEED BOOK 1448, PAGE 179,
189 ROCKDALE COUNTY, GEORGIA RECORDS.
190 (11) Old Covington Hwy and Georgia Railroad (CSX Property)
191 ALL THAT TRACT or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lots 299, 321, 323 & 324
192 of the 16th District of Rockdale County, Georgia and being more particularly described
193 as follows:
194 Beginning at the intersection of the northwesterly Right of Way of Gees Mill Rd (80'
195 R/W) and the northerly Right of Way of Georgia Railroad (198' R/W); Thence leaving
196 said Right of Way South 82 degrees 46 minutes 41 seconds West a distance of 86.40 feet
197 to a point; Thence South 64 degrees 44 minutes 40 seconds West a distance of 119.29
198 feet to a point; Thence North 54 degrees 15 minutes 47 seconds West a distance of
H. B. 404
- 8 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
199 153.24 feet to a point; Thence North 57 degrees 53 minutes 01 seconds West a distance
200 of 118.42 feet to a point; Thence North 60 degrees 31 minutes 33 seconds West a
201 distance of 209.36 feet to a point; Thence North 62 degrees 12 minutes 01 seconds West
202 a distance of 209.35 feet to a point; Thence North 66 degrees 57 minutes 51 seconds
203 West a distance of 135.03 feet to a point; Thence North 68 degrees 40 minutes 39
204 seconds West a distance of 204.63 feet to a point; Thence North 72 degrees 31 minutes
205 21 seconds West a distance of 3520.91 feet to a point; Thence North 81 degrees 45
206 minutes 40 seconds West a distance of 92.06 feet to a point; Thence South 77 degrees 15
207 minutes 13 seconds West a distance of 77.16 feet to a point; Thence North 80 degrees 09
208 minutes 15 seconds West a distance of 296.60 feet to a point; Thence North 79 degrees
209 11 minutes 35 seconds West a distance of 288.40 feet to a point; Thence South 43
210 degrees 51 minutes 52 seconds West a distance of 240.96 feet to a point; Thence North
211 52 degrees 52 minutes 00 seconds West a distance of 110.73 feet to a point; Thence
212 North 15 degrees 55 minutes 21 seconds East a distance of 219.94 feet to a point, said
213 point being on the northern Right of Way of Old Covington Hwy; Thence North 80
214 degrees 21 minutes 18 seconds West a distance of 16.70 feet to a point; Thence North 83
215 degrees 42 minutes 57 seconds West a distance of 39.29 feet to a point; Thence North 80
216 degrees 19 minutes 14 seconds West a distance of 52.04 feet to a point, said point being
217 on the northern Right of Way of Old Covington Hwy; Thence leaving said Right of Way
218 North 10 degrees 29 minutes 18 seconds East a distance of 188.15 feet to a point; Thence
219 South 72 degrees 24 minutes 11 seconds East a distance of 214.28 feet to a point; Thence
220 South 14 degrees 21 minutes 05 seconds West a distance of 51.16 feet to a point; Thence
221 South 72 degrees 21 minutes 11 seconds East a distance of 181.63 feet to a point; Thence
222 North 40 degrees 15 minutes 55 seconds East a distance of 214.94 feet to a point, said
223 point being on the western Right of Way of Ga Hwy 138 SE/ Ga Hwy 20 SE; Thence
224 leaving said Right of Way South 76 degrees 56 minutes 29 seconds East a distance of
225 113.70 feet to a point, said point being on the eastern Right of Way of Ga Hwy 138
H. B. 404
- 9 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
226 SE/Ga Hwy 20 SE and the northerly Right of Way of Georgia Railroad (198' R/W);
227 Thence along said Railroad Right of Way South 73 degrees 28 minutes 51 seconds East
228 a distance of 219.64 feet to a point; Thence South 73 degrees 28 minutes 57 seconds East
229 a distance of 39.60 feet to a point; Thence South 73 degrees 28 minutes 48 seconds East
230 a distance of 252.58 feet to a point; Thence South 73 degrees 28 minutes 40 seconds East
231 a distance of 153.77 feet to a point; Thence South 72 degrees 49 minutes 40 seconds East
232 a distance of 124.27 feet to a point; Thence South 72 degrees 35 minutes 12 seconds East
233 a distance of 273.67 feet to a point; Thence South 72 degrees 37 minutes 02 seconds East
234 a distance of 298.07 feet to a point; Thence South 71 degrees 18 minutes 50 seconds East
235 a distance of 661.49 feet to a point; Thence South 71 degrees 16 minutes 54 seconds East
236 a distance of 101.65 feet to a point; Thence South 72 degrees 22 minutes 38 seconds East
237 a distance of 680.17 feet to a point; Thence South 72 degrees 24 minutes 30 seconds East
238 a distance of 178.82 feet to a point; Thence South 72 degrees 27 minutes 20 seconds East
239 a distance of 614.42 feet to a point; Thence South 72 degrees 54 minutes 47 seconds East
240 a distance of 118.54 feet to a point; Thence South 72 degrees 25 minutes 58 seconds East
241 a distance of 262.47 feet to a point; Thence South 70 degrees 04 minutes 31 seconds East
242 a distance of 82.46 feet to a point; Thence South 70 degrees 01 minutes 08 seconds East
243 a distance of 164.20 feet to a point; Thence South 68 degrees 14 minutes 47 seconds East
244 a distance of 50.97 feet to a point; Thence South 65 degrees 53 minutes 52 seconds East
245 a distance of 136.96 feet to a point; Thence South 62 degrees 15 minutes 25 seconds East
246 a distance of 267.75 feet to a point; Thence South 59 degrees 15 minutes 00 seconds East
247 a distance of 171.53 feet to a point; Thence South 55 degrees 52 minutes 19 seconds East
248 a distance of 209.64 feet to a point; Thence South 52 degrees 19 minutes 45 seconds East
249 a distance of 162.13 feet to a point; Thence South 50 degrees 26 minutes 51 seconds East
250 a distance of 46.03 feet to the TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING.
251 Said area contains 26.94 Acres/1,173,450 SF.
252 (12) 1412 Old McDonough Hwy
H. B. 404
- 10 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
253 All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lot 299 of the 16th District of
254 Rockdale County, Georgia, and being more particularly described as follows:
255 Commencing at a point at the intersection of the southerly right-of-way of Old Salem
256 Road (right-of-way varies) and the easterly right-of-way of Old McDonough Highway
257 (right-of-way varies); thence along the south right-of-way of Old Salem Road
258 (right-of-way varies) thence South 56 degrees 31 minutes 57 seconds East for a distance
259 of 331.44 feet along said right-of-way to an IPF (R/W Mon) said point being the TRUE
260 POINT OF BEGINNING; thence leaving said right-of-way South 33 degrees 30 minutes
261 17 seconds West for a distance of 148.55 feet to a point; thence South 57 degrees 57
262 minutes 56 seconds West for a distance of 374.25 feet to an IPF (1/2" rebar); thence
263 North 13 degrees 02 minutes 08 seconds East for a distance of 54.85 feet to a point;
264 thence North 85 degrees 48 minutes 20 seconds West for a distance of 91.81 feet to an
265 IPF (1" crimped top pipe) on the east right-of-way of Old McDonough Highway
266 (right-of-way varies); thence continuing along said right-of-way along a curve to the left
267 having a radius of 1,246.75 feet and an arc length of 172.85 feet, being subtended by a
268 chord of North 27 degrees 31 minutes 38 seconds East for a distance of 172.71 feet to a
269 point; thence continuing along said right-of-way along a curve to the left having a radius
270 of 1,856.81 feet and an arc length of 124.94 feet, being subtended by a chord of North 21
271 degrees 08 minutes 28 seconds East for a distance of 124.92 feet to a point; thence
272 leaving said right-of-way south 65 degrees 15 minutes 42 seconds East for a distance of
273 265.66 feet to a point; thence North 33 degrees 30 minutes 17 seconds East for a distance
274 of 153.92 feet to a point said point being on the south right-of-way of Old Salem Road
275 (right-of-way varies); thence continuing along said right-of-way south 56 degrees 31
276 minutes 57 seconds East for a distance of 35.00 feet to an IPF (R/W Mon) and the TRUE
277 POINT OF BEGINNING; together with and subject to covenants, easements, and
278 restrictions of record, as more fully shown as Tract 1 on that certain plat of survey for
279 Microtel, dated February 8, 2006, by Proline Surveying, Inc., Registered Land Surveyor,
H. B. 404
- 11 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
280 James A, Jacobs, R.L.S. Number 2867, recorded in Plat Book 34, Page 48, Records of
281 Rockdale County, Georgia.
282 (13) 1394 Old McDonough Hwy
283 All and only that parcel of land designated as Tax Parcel 0750010017, Land Lot 299,
284 16th District, Rockdale County, Georgia, being 1.1 acre more or less, Tract 2 on that
285 certain plat for Microtel, shown in Plat Book 34, Page 48, Rockdale County, Georgia
286 records and being particularly described in Deed Book 5428, Page 215, aforesaid records
287 and being known as 1394 Old McDonough Highway Southeast.
288 (14) 1161 Old Salem Rd
289 Parcel 1:
290 All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lots 298 and 299 of the 16th
291 District, Rockdale County, Georgia, shown as Lot 1 on that certain plat of survey
292 recorded in Plat Book Y, Page 79, of the Rockdale County, Georgia Records and being
293 more particularly described as follows:
294 To find the Point of Beginning commence at a right-of-way monument found at the
295 intersection of the Southwesterly right-of-way line of Old Salem Road (right-of-way
296 varies) with the Westerly mitered right-of-way line of State Route 138; running thence
297 along said Southwesterly right-of-way line of Old Salem Road the following courses and
298 distances: North 54 degrees 30 minutes 26 seconds West, a distance of 184.68 feet to a
299 point; North 51 degrees 31 minutes 59 seconds West, a distance of 39.12 feet to a point;
300 North 54 degrees 46 minutes 10 seconds West, a distance of 79.86 feet to a point; North
301 54 degrees 44 minutes 12 seconds West, a distance of 97.76 feet to an iron pin placed,
302 said point being the Point of Beginning; running thence from the Point of Beginning as
303 thus established, and leaving the right-of-way line of Old Salem Road, South 34 degrees
304 44 minutes 00 seconds West, a distance of 191.72 feet to an iron pin placed; run thence
305 South 30 degrees 58 minutes 41 seconds East, a distance of 36.56 feet to an iron pin
306 placed; run thence South 56 degrees 52 minutes 38 seconds East, a distance of 62.26 feet
H. B. 404
- 12 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
307 to an iron pin placed; run thence South 35 degrees 20 minutes 28 seconds West, a
308 distance of 108.51 feet to a 2 inch open top pipe; run thence North 30 degrees 58 minutes
309 41 seconds West, a distance of 391.42 feet to a one and three-fourths inch open top pipe
310 found; run thence North 34 degrees 44 minutes 00 seconds East, a distance of 148.55 feet
311 to a right-of-way monument found on the Southwesterly right-of-way line of Old Salem
312 Road; run thence, along the Southwesterly right-of-way line of Old Salem Road the
313 following courses and distances: South 55 degrees 20 minutes 55 seconds East, a distance
314 of 240.20 feet to an iron pin placed; North 29 degrees 33 minutes 21 seconds East, a
315 distance of 4.76 feet to a right-of-way monument found; South 54 degrees 44 minutes 12
316 seconds East, a distance of 22.37 feet to an iron pin placed, said Point being the Point of
317 Beginning.
318 Parcel 2:
319 Easments and other interest in real property contained in that certain drainage easement
320 agreement from U.S. Enterprises, Inc. to Modernage, Inc., dated January 28, 1993, filed
321 January 29, 1993, recorded in Deed Book 818, Page 306, aforesaid records.
322 (15) 1167 Old Salem Rd
323 All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lots 298 and 299 of the 16th
324 District of Rockdale County, Georgia, being Lot 3 as shown on revised final plat for U.S.
325 Enterprises, Inc. and William E. Corey, recorded in Plat Book Y, Page 107, Rockdale
326 County, Georgia records, which plat is incorporated herein by reference and made a part
327 hereof.
328 (16) 1173 Old Salem Rd
329 All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lots 298 and 299 of the 16th
330 District of Rockdale County, Georgia, and being more particularly described as follows:
331 BEGINNING at an iron pin found on the southwesterly side of the 80 foot right-of-way
332 of Old Salem Road, 205 feet northwesterly as measured along the Southwesterly side of
333 the right-of-way of Old Salem Road, from the point of intersection of the Southwesterly
H. B. 404
- 13 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
334 side of the right-of-way of Old Salem Road with the southwesterly side of the
335 right-of-way of Georgia Highway No. 20/Georgia Highway No. 138; thence South 39
336 degrees 17 minutes West 336.71 feet to a point; thence North 41 degrees 35 minutes West
337 101.6 feet to an iron pin found; thence North 35 degrees 54 minutes East 313.16 feet to
338 an iron pin found on the Southwesterly side of the right-of-way of Old Salem Road;
339 thence South 54 degrees 34 minutes East along the Southwesterly side of the right-of-way
340 of Old Salem Road 119 feet to the iron pin found at the POINT OF BEGINNING, being
341 a tract of land containing .816 acres as shown on survey for L.D. Smith dated May 16.
342 1983, prepared by Robert C. Pace, Registered Land Surveyor No. 1359, which is of
343 record at Plat Book Q, Page 143, Rockdale County, Georgia Records, and is incorporated
344 herein by reference and made a part hereof.
345 LESS AND EXCEPT any portion of said property affected by the following instruments
346 in favor of the Georgia Department of Transportation: (a) dated May 11, 1987 recorded
347 in Deed Book 366, Page 471, Rockdale County, Georgia Records; (b) dated September
348 22, 1987 recorded in Deed Book 387, Page 614; aforesaid records; (c) dated November
349 12, 1987 recorded in Deed Book 390, Page 344, aforesaid records.
350 This is the same property conveyed in Warranty Deed to U.S. Enterprises, Inc. from L.D.
351 Smith, dated April 2, 1984, filed April 3, 1984, recorded in Deed Book 252, Page 444,
352 Superior Court Clerk's Office, Rockdale County, Georgia deed records.
353 (17) 1437 Highway 138
354 ALL THAT PARCEL OF LAND LYING AND BEING IN LAND LOT 298 OF THE
355 16TH DISTRICT OF ROCKDALE COUNTY, GEORGIA, MORE PARTICULARLY
356 DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
357 BEGINNING AT A CONCRETE MONUMENT FOUND AT THE INTERSECTION
358 OF THE NORTHWESTERLY R/W OF STATE ROUTES 138 & 20 (R/W VARIES) &
359 THE SOUTHWESTERLY R/W OF OLD SALEM ROAD, FORMERLY KNOWN AS
360 PEEKS CHAPEL ROAD (80' R/W) AND BEING THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING,
H. B. 404
- 14 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
361 THENCE RUNNING S 05° 31' 39" E A DISTANCE OF 50.14" (sic) TO A CONCRETE
362 MONUMENT FOUND, THENCE RUNNING S 43° 44' 10" W A DISTANCE OF
363 138.37' TO A ½" IPF, THENCE RUNNING N 47° 03' 58" W A DISTANCE OF 202.60'
364 TO A ½" IPF, THENCE RUNNING N 39°16' 50" E A DISTANCE OF 173.55' TO A
365 CONCRETE MONUMENT FOUND, THENCE RUNNING S 54°20' 24" E A
366 DISTANCE OF 9.42' TO A CONCRETE MONUMENT FOUND, THENCE RUNNING
367 N 32° 51' 05" E A DISTANCE OF 12.47' TO A CONCRETE MONUMENT FOUND
368 ON THE SOUTHERN R/W OF OLD SALEM ROAD, THENCE RUNNING S 54° 33'
369 09" E A DISTANCE OF 165.25' TO A CONCRETE MONUMENT FOUND AND
370 BEING THE TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING.
371 As shown and disclosed on ALTA/ACSM Land Title Survey for Shell Central, Job No.
372 05 -12- 008; 126, coordinated by International Land Services, Inc., bearing the seal and
373 certification of Ronald T. Godwin, Georgia Registered Land Surveyor No. 2696, dated
374 June 20, 2006, last revised September 22, 2006 and finally revised on November 5, 2006.
375 TOGETHER WITH Easements contained in Warranty Deed between Autotronic
376 Systems, Inc. and The Krystal Company, a Tennessee corporation, dated March 21, 1977,
377 filed for record April 5,1977 at 1:36 p.m., recorded in Deed Book 168, Page 934, Records
378 of Rockdale County, Georgia.
379 (18) 1447 Highway 138
380 All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lot 298 of the 16th District of
381 Rockdale County, Georgia, and being more particularly described as follows:
382 Beginning at an iron pin located 211.76 feet southwesterly along the northwest
383 right-of-way of Georgia Highway #138 from the northwesterly right-of-way intersection
384 of Georgia Highway #138 and Peeks Chapel Road; thence southwesterly along the
385 right-of-way curvature of Georgia Highway #138, 20.00 feet to a concrete monument;
386 thence South 43 degrees 29 minutes 30 seconds West along the right-of-way of Georgia
387 Highway #138, 141.79 feet to an iron pin; thence North 44 degrees 57 minutes 00
H. B. 404
- 15 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
388 seconds West 190.00 feet to an iron pin; thence North 39 degrees 16 minutes 50 seconds
389 East 338.65 feet to an iron pin on the southerly right-of-way of Peeks Chapel Road;
390 thence South 54 degrees 34 minutes 10 seconds East along the southerly right-of-way of
391 Peeks Chapel Road 98.51 feet to an iron pin; thence South 44 degrees 17 minutes 35
392 seconds West 195.02 feet to an iron pin; thence South 48 degrees 32 minutes 30 seconds
393 East 120.00 feet to the southwesterly right-of-way of Georgia Highway #138 and the
394 Point of Beginning, all as shown by plat of survey for The Krystal Company prepared by
395 Construction Engineering Associates, dated December 20, 1977,
396 LESS AND EXCEPT from the above described property that portion of the property
397 conveyed by that certain Limited Warranty Deed from The Krystal Company, a
398 Tennessee corporation, successor by merger to Krystal Real Estate Co., II to Star
399 Enterprise, a New York general partnership, dated May 1, 1996, filed for record May 2,
400 1996 at 2:27 p.m., recorded in Deed Book 1232, Page 273, Records of Rockdale County,
401 Georgia; as re-recorded May 6, 1996 at 11:41 a.m., recorded in Deed Book 1233, Page
402 171, aforesaid Records.
403 FURTHER LESS AND EXCEPT from the above described property that portion of the
404 property conveyed by that certain Right of Way Deed from The Krystal Co. to
405 Department of Transportation, dated May 7, 1997, filed for record May 22, 1997 at 3:21
406 p.m., recorded in Deed Book 1363, Page 78, aforesaid Records.
407 (19) 1141 Old Salem Rd
408 All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lots 296 and 299 of the 16th
409 District, Rockdale County, Georgia, containing 2.615 acres according to a certain plat of
410 survey entitled "Boundary Retracement Survey for City Tec Design, LLC," prepared by
411 Andy William Surveying, Inc, GA RLS 42617, dated May 30, 2022 and recorded in Plat
412 Book 41, Page 185. Rockdale County Records. Incorporated herein by reference.
H. B. 404
- 16 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
413 This property is currently designated as 1141 Old Salem Road, Conyers, GA. Tax Parcel
414 #0750010013
415 (20) 1152 Old Salem Rd
416 All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lot 299, 16th District, Rockdale
417 County, Georgia, as more completely shown on that survey for William F. Palmer and
418 Theresa J. Palmer by McNally & Patrick, Lloyd C. McNally, Jr., Registered Land
419 Surveyor No. 2040, dated June 21, 1990, with a final revision date of July 24, 1990, being
420 more completely described as follows:
421 Beginning at a point on the southwestern right-of-way of Interstate Highway 20, said
422 point being 505.42 feet as measured along the southwestern right-of-way of Interstate
423 Highway 20 from the intersection of the southwestern right-of-way of Interstate Highway
424 20 and the western right-of-way of State Route 138 if said intersection was extended to
425 form an angle instead of a miter; thence South 34 degrees 05 minutes 54 seconds west
426 along the northwestern boundary of property now or formerly owned by Rockdale
427 Community Bank 273.24 feet to an iron pin set on the northeastern right-of-way of Old
428 Salem Road; thence North 56 degrees 26 minutes 39 seconds west along the northeastern
429 right-of-way of Old Salem Road 205.77 feet to an iron pin set; thence north 33 degrees
430 33 minutes 21 second east 267.68 feet to an iron pin set on the southwestern right-of-way
431 of Interstate Highway 20; thence south 57 degrees 58 minutes 09 seconds east along the
432 southwestern right-of-way of Interstate 20 208.43 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING,
433 containing 1.2855 acres more or less.
434 (21) 1172 Old Salem Rd
435 ALL THAT TRACT OR PARCEL OF LAND lying and being in Land Lots 298 and 299
436 of the 16th District of Rockdale County, Georgia, known as Tract l, and being more
437 particularly and fully described on that certain plat prepared by Louis D. Patrick, R.L.S.
438 1757 for the Rockdale Community Bank dated November 2, 1987, as more particularly
H. B. 404
- 17 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
439 depicted on a plat recorded in Plat Book V, Page 120, Records of Rockdale County,
440 Georgia, which plat is incorporated by reference hereto.
441 (22) 1427 Highway 138
442 ALL THAT TRACT OR PARCEL OF LAND LYING AND BEING IN LAND LOT
443 299, OF THE 16th DISTRICT, ROCKDALE COUNTY, GEORGIA, AND BEING
444 MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
445 BEGINNING AT A ½ INCH RE-BAR SET AT THE INTERSECTION OF THE
446 NORTHWESTERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF GEORGIA STATE ROUTE NO. 138,
447 A.K.A. GEORGIA STATE ROUTE NO. 20 (110 FOOT RIGHT-OF-WAY) AND THE
448 NORTHEASTERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF OLD SALEM ROAD (80 FOOT
449 RIGHT-OF-WAY); RUNNING THENCE NORTH 56 DEGREES 19 MINUTES 00
450 SECONDS WEST ALONG THE NORTHEASTERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF OLD
451 SALEM ROAD A DISTANCE OF 270.00 FEET TO A ½ INCH RE-BAR SET;
452 THENCE NORTH 35 DEGREES IO MINUTES 40 SECONDS EAST A DISTANCE
453 OF 145.06 FEET TO A ½ INCH RE-BAR SET; THENCE SOUTH 56 DEGREES 18
454 MINUTES 30 SECONDS EAST A DISTANCE OF 290 FEET TO A ½ INCH RE-BAR
455 FOUND ON THE NORTHWESTERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF GEORGIA STATE
456 ROUTE NO. 138; THENCE SOUTH 43 DEGREES 09 MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST
457 ALONG THE NORTHWESTERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF GEORGIA STATE ROUTE
458 NO. 138 A DISTANCE OF 28.75 FEET TO A POINT; THENCE ALONG A CURVE
459 TO THE LEFT AN ARC DISTANCE OF 118.15 FEET (SAID ARC BEING
460 SUBTENDED BY A CHORD OF SOUTH 42 DEGREES 57 MINUTES 43 SECONDS
461 WEST A DISTANCE OF 118.15 FEET AND HAVING A RADIUS OF 17,248.734
462 FEET) TO A ½ INCH RE-BAR SET AND THE POINT OF BEGINNING.
463 IN ACCORDANCE WITH PLAT PREPARED BY PEARSON & ASSOCIATES, INC.,
464 ENTITLED BOUNDARY & ABOVE GROUND "AS-BUILT'' SURVEY.
H. B. 404
- 18 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
465 TOGETHER WITH, and for the benefit of the above described land (the "Benefitted
466 Land") an easement appurtenant thereto for the construction, installation, maintenance
467 and use of a slope (the "Slope Easement") providing lateral support to the Benefitted
468 Land, over, through and across all that tract or parcel of land (the "Burdened Land") lying
469 and being in Land Lot 299 of the 16"' District of Rockdale County, Georgia, the same
470 being more particularly described as follows:
471 TO FIND THE POINT OF BEGINNING, commence at a ½ inch re-bar located at the
472 intersection of the northwesterly right-of-way line of State Route 138, which is also State
473 Route 20 (110-foot right-of-way) with the northeasterly right-of-way line of Old Salem
474 Road (80-foot right-of-way); running thence north 56° 19' west along the northeasterly
475 right-of-way line of Old Salem Road a distance of 270.0 feet to a ½ inch re-bar, which
476 marks the POINT OF BEGINNING; with the POINT OF BEGINNING thus established,
477 running thence north 35° 10' 40" east a distance of 145.06 feet to a ½ inch re-bar; running
478 thence south 56" 18' 30" east a distance of 90.0 feet; running thence north 43° 09' 30" east
479 a distance of 20.28 feet to a point; running thence north 56° 18' 30" west a distance of
480 112.82 feet to a point; running thence south 35° 10' 40" west a distance of 165.07 feet to
481 a point on the northeasterly right-of-way line of Old Salem Road; running thence south
482 56° 19' east along the northeasterly right-of-way line of Old Salem Road a distance of
483 20.01 feet to the ½ inch re-bar, which marks the POINT OF BEGINNING.
484 (23) 1417 Highway 138
485 ALL THAT TRACT OR PARCEL OF LAND LYING AND BEING IN LAND LOT 299
486 OF THE 16th DISTRICT OF ROCKDALE COUNTY, GEORGIA AND BEING MORE
487 PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
488 BEGINNING AT A 1/2 INCH REBAR SET AT THE INTERSECTION OF THE
489 NORTHWESTERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF STATE ROUTE NO. 138 (ALSO KNOWN
490 AS STOCKBRIDGE HIGHWAY - R/W VARIES) AND THE SOUTHWESTERLY
491 RIGHT-OF-WAY OF INTERSTATE 20 (R/W VARIES); THENCE ALONG THE
H. B. 404
- 19 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
492 NORTHWESTERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF STATE ROUTE NO. 138 SOUTH 43
493 DEGREES 07 MINUTES 00 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 114.67 FEET TO A
494 1/2 INCH REBAR SET; THENCE NORTH 56 DEGREES 18 MINUTES 30 SECONDS
495 WEST A DISTANCE OF 197.28 FEET TO A 1/2 INCH REBAR FOUND; THENCE
496 NORTH 43 DEGREES 29 MINUTES 39 SECONDS EAST A DISTANCE OF 143.63
497 FEET TO A 1/2 INCH REBAR FOUND ON THE SOUTHWESTERLY
498 RIGHT-OF-WAY OF INTERSTATE 20; THENCE ALONG THE SOUTHWESTERLY
499 RIGHT-OF-WAY OF INTERSTATE 20 SOUTH 58 DEGREES 16 MINUTES 40
500 SECONDS EAST A DISTANCE OF 125.33 FEET TO A 1/2 INCH REBAR SET;
501 THENCE CONTINUING ALONG SAID RIGHT-OF-WAY SOUTH 30 DEGREES 03
502 MINUTES 38 SECONDS EAST A DISTANCE OF 73.98 FEET TO A 1/2 INCH
503 REBAR SET AND THE POINT OF BEGINNING; SAID TRACT CONTAINS 0.6257
504 ACRES OF LAND.
505 SAID PROPERTY BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED ON THAT
506 BOUNDARY & ABOVE GROUND "AS-BUILT' SURVEY FOR PETROLEUM
507 REALTY II, LLC, PETROLEUM REALTY INVESTMENT PARTNERS, L.P. (PRIP),
508 LEHMAN COMMERCIAL PAPER INC., ITS SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS,
509 LEHMAN BROTHERS HOLDINGS INC. D/B/A LEHMAN CAPITAL, A DIVISION
510 OF LEHMAN BROTHERS HOLDINGS INC., AND SIEGFRIED, RIVERA, LERNER,
511 DELATORRE & SOBEL, P.A., AND THEIR SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS AND
512 CHICAGO TITLE INSURANCE COMPANY, PREPARED BY PEARSON &
513 ASSOCIATES, INC., DATED JULY 27, 1998, AS LAST REVISED AND UPDATED
514 DECEMBER 10, 1998, AND BEARING THE STAMP AND SEAL OF WILLIAM
515 W. DELOACH, GRLS NO. 1711.
516 (24) 1420 Highway 138
H. B. 404
- 20 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
517 ALL THAT CERTAIN PIECE, PARCEL, OR TRACT OF LAND LYING AND BEING
518 IN LAND LOT 298 AND 299 OF THE 16TH DISTRICT OF ROCKDALE COUNTY,
519 GEORGIA AND BING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
520 COMMENCING AT AN IRON PIN MARKING THE NORTHERLY END OF A
521 CHAMFER BETWEEN THE NORTHEASTERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF OLD SALEM
522 ROAD SE (84 FOOT PUBLIC RIGHT-OF-WAY AND SOUTHERLY
523 RIGHT-OF-WAY OF GEORGIA HWY 138/20 (114.5 FOOT RIGHT-OF-WAY),
524 THENCE ALONG THE SOUTHERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF GEORGIA HWY 138/20
525 (FOR THE FOLLOWING THREE CALLS) (1) N43°08'30"E A DISTANCE OF 30.02
526 FEET TO AN IRON PIN, (2) THENCE S63°21'30"E A DISTANCE OF 2.87 FEET TO
527 AN IRON PIN AND BEING THE POINT OF BEGINNING, (3) THENCE N43°08'30"E
528 A DISTANCE OF 168.95 FEET TO AN IRON PIN, THENCE ALONG THE
529 SOUTHERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF IRIS DRIVE SOUTHEAST S89°18'38"E A
530 DISTANCE OF 166.01 FEET TO AN IRON PIN, THENCE ALONG THE COMMON
531 LINE OF TL CONYERS, LLC S43°35'42"W A DISTANCE OF 245.49 FEET TO AN
532 IRON PIN, THENCE ALONG THE COMMON LINE OF THE ARTHUR E. & GAIL
533 S. ELDRIDGE REVOCABLE TRUST (FOR THE FOLLOWING THREE CALLS) (1)
534 N46°49'26"W A DISTANCE OF 50.58 FEET TO AN IRON PIN, (2) THENCE
535 S45°44'01"W A DISTANCE OF 15.04 FEET TO AN IRON PIN, (3) THENCE
536 N63°21'30"W A DISTANCE OF 72.26 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND
537 CONTAINING 24,722 S.F. OR 0.568 ACRES MORE OR LESS.
538 BEING THE SAME PARCEL DESCRIBED IN DEED BOOK 253 AT PAGE 294 AND
539 IN TITLE COMMITMENT PROVIDED BY FIRST AMERICAN TITLE INSURANCE
540 COMPANY #005827-0003.001, DATED: SEPTEMBER 15, 2015 AT 5:00 P.M.
541 TOGETHER WITH THAT CERTAIN NON-EXCLUSIVE PERPETUAL EASEMENT
542 FOR SEWER AS PROVIDED IN THAT CERTAIN WARRANTY DEED RECORDED
H. B. 404
- 21 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
543 IN DEED BOOK 128, PAGE 118, IN THE OFFICE OF THE CLERK OF THE
544 SUPERIOR COURT OF ROCKDALE COUNTY, GEORGIA.
545 (25) 1436 Highway 138
546 Said land being also described on survey prepared on October 19, 2015 by Smith &
547 Smith Land Surveyors, P.C., under the certification and seal of William C. Smith,
548 Georgia RLS #1803, File No. 6502, as follows:
549 All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lots 298 and 299 of the 16th
550 District of Rockdale County, Georgia containing 0.380 Acre and being more particularly
551 described as follows:
552 Beginning at a chiseled and painted hole in the Concrete Driveway at the Northern end
553 of a mitered corner at the intersection of the East right-of-way of State Routes 20 and 138
554 (R/W varies) with the North right-of-way of Old Salem Road (84'R/W);
555 Thence North 43 degrees 13 minutes 57 seconds East for a distance of 30.06 feet along
556 the East right-of-way of State Routes 20 and 138 to an iron pin found;
557 Thence South 63 degrees 21 minutes 30 seconds East for a distance of 75.13 feet leaving
558 said East right-of-way to an iron pin found;
559 Thence North 45 degrees 44 minutes 01 seconds East for a distance of 15.04 feet to an
560 iron pin found; Thence South 46 degrees 28 minutes 57 seconds East for a distance of
561 125.00 feet to an iron pin found;
562 Thence South 44 degrees 20 minutes 29 seconds West for a distance of 92.85 feet to a
563 point on the North right-of-way of Old Salem Road, which point is North 44 degrees 20
564 minutes 29 seconds East a distance of 1.28 feet from an iron pin found;
565 Thence along a curve to the left having a radius of 855.12 feet and an arc length of 148.84
566 feet, being subtended by a chord of North 50 degrees 52 minutes 09 seconds West for a
567 distance of 148.65 feet along the North right-of-way of Old Salem Road to a Point at the
568 South end of the mitered corner at the intersection of the North right-of-way of Old
569 Salem Road with the East right-of-way of State Routes 20 and 138;
H. B. 404
- 22 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
570 Thence North 08 degrees 29 minutes 40 seconds West for a distance of 60.62 feet along
571 said mitered corner to a chiseled and painted hole in the Concrete Driveway and the Point
572 of Beginning.
573 Also described as:
574 All that tract or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lots 298 and 299 of the 16th
575 District of Rockdale County, Georgia, being more particularly described as follows:
576 BEGIN at a drill hole in the Concrete Driveway at the Northern end of a mitered corner
577 at the intersection of the easterly right of way line of Georgia Highway 20 (also Georgia
578 Hwy 138, variable width public R/W) with the northerly right of way line of Old Salem
579 Road (84' public R/W); thence North 43°13'57" East along the easterly right of way line
580 of said Georgia Highway 20 a distance of 30.10 feet to a rebar; thence South 63°39'08"
581 East a distance of 75.05 feet to a rebar; thence North 45°19'37" East a distance of 15.10
582 feet to a rebar; thence South 46°48'37'' East a distance of 124.85 feet to a rebar; thence
583 South 43°55'17" West a distance of 92.85 feet to a rebar on the northerly right of way line
584 of Old Salem Road, said point lying on a non-tangent circular curve to the left, having a
585 radius 855.12 feet and a central angle of 9°58'21"; thence along said curved northerly
586 right of way line an arc distance 148.84 feet (chord: N 51°00'16" W, 148.65') to a rebar
587 at the southern end of a mitered corner at the intersection of said northerly right of way
588 line of Old Salem Road with the easterly right of way line of the aforesaid Georgia
589 Highway 20; thence North 09°14'52" West a distance of 60.34 feet to the POINT OF
590 BEGINNING;
591 Containing 0.38 acres, more or less.
592 Said lands situate, lying and being in Rockdale County, Georgia.
593 Together with Easement rights set forth in Warranty Deed from Mrs. Georgia D. Cheek,
594 a/k/a Mrs. Georgie D. Cheek, Mrs. Omar R. Cheek and Hugh Wallace Check to KFC
595 National Management Company, dated May 30, 1974, filed June 1, 1974, recorded in
596 Deed Book 139. Page 992, Rockdale County Records.
H. B. 404
- 23 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
597 (26) 1285 Highway 138
598 ALL THAT CERTAIN PIECE, PARCEL, OR TRACT OF LAND LYING AND BEING
599 IN LAND LOT 298 AND 299 OF THE 16TH DISTRICT OF ROCKDALE COUNTY,
600 GEORGIA AND BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
601 BEGINNING AT AN IRON PIN MARKING THE NORTHERLY END OF A
602 CHAMFER BETWEEN THE NORTHEASTERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF OLD SALEM
603 ROAD SE (84 FOOT PUBLIC RIGHT-OF-WAY) AND SOUTHERLY
604 RIGHT-OF-WAY OF GEORGIA HWY 138/20 (114.5 FOOT RIGHT-OF-WAY),
605 THENCE ALONG THE SOUTHERLY RIGHT-OF-WAY OF GEORGIA HWY 138/20
606 N43°08'30"E A DISTANCE OF 30.02 FEET TO AN IRON PIN BEING THE POINT
607 OF BEGINNING, THENCE N43°08'30"E A DISTANCE OF 167.25 FEET TO A
608 CONCRETE MONUMENT, THENCE S89°18'38"E A DISTANCE OF 169.74 FEET
609 TO AN IRON PIN, THENCE ALONG THE COMMON LINE OF TL CONYERS, LLC
610 S43°35'42"W A DISTANCE OF 245.49 FEET TO AN IRON PIN, THENCE ALONG
611 THE COMMON LINES OF ELDRIDGE N46°49'26"W A DISTANCE OF 50.58 FEET
612 TO AN IRON PIN, THENCE S45°44'01"W A DISTANCE OF 15.04 FEET TO AN
613 IRON PIN, THENCE N63°21'30"W A DISTANCE OF 75.13 FEET TO THE POINT OF
614 BEGINNING AND CONTAINING 25,185 S.F. OR 0.578 ACRES MORE OR LESS.
615 (27) Milstead Ave & Milstead Rd
616 Tract 1
617 ALL THAT TRACT or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lots 302 & 318 of the
618 16th District of Rockdale County, Georgia and being more particularly described as
619 follows:
620 Beginning at a point on the southerly Right of Way of Milstead Rd (50' R/W) and the
621 easterly Right of Way of Milstead Ave (100' R/W); Thence southwesterly along the Right
622 of Way of Milstead Avenue South 59 degrees 23 minutes 58 seconds West a distance of
623 141.58 feet to a point; Thence South 62 degrees 14 minutes 39 seconds West a distance
H. B. 404
- 24 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
624 of 132.79 feet to a point; Thence South 65 degrees 13 minutes 13 seconds West a
625 distance of 128.48 feet to a point; Thence South 65 degrees 21 minutes 03 seconds West
626 a distance of 45.75 feet to a point; Thence South 68 degrees 40 minutes 44 seconds West
627 a distance of 228.41 feet to a point; Thence South 71 degrees 19 minutes 07 seconds
628 West a distance of 26.51 feet to a point; Thence South 69 degrees 51 minutes 07 seconds
629 West a distance of 318.71 feet to a point; Thence South 70 degrees 06 minutes 42
630 seconds West a distance of 100.24 feet to a point; Thence South 69 degrees 41 minutes
631 50 seconds West a distance of 89.83 feet to a point, said point being on the southern
632 Right of Way of Milstead Ave (100' R/W); Thence North 49 degrees 47 minutes 12
633 seconds West a distance of 114.82 feet to a point, said point being on the northern Right
634 of Way of Milstead Ave (100' R/W); Thence North 69 degrees 39 minutes 42 seconds
635 East a distance of 52.28 feet to a point; Thence North 69 degrees 38 minutes 02 seconds
636 East a distance of 59.68 feet to a point; Thence North 69 degrees 57 minutes 39 seconds
637 East a distance of 73.43 feet to a point; Thence North 70 degrees 06 minutes 43 seconds
638 East a distance of 117.47 feet to a point; Thence North 69 degrees 22 minutes 27 seconds
639 East a distance of 87.35 feet to a point; Thence North 69 degrees 19 minutes 25 seconds
640 East a distance of 8.41 feet to a point; Thence north 70 degrees 25 minutes 51 seconds
641 East a distance of 16.78 feet to a point, said point being on the northern Right of Way of
642 Milstead Ave and Old Milstead Rd; Thence north 70 degrees 01 minutes 05 seconds East
643 a distance of 137.27 feet to a point, said point being on the northern Right of Way of
644 Milstead Ave and the southern Right of Way of Old Milstead Rd; Thence North 69
645 degrees 51 minutes 08 seconds East a distance of 16.61 feet to a point; Thence North 71
646 degrees 32 minutes 25 seconds East a distance of 22.01 feet to a point; Thence North 68
647 degrees 40 minutes 50 seconds East a distance of 225.65 feet to a point; Thence North
648 65 degrees 13 minutes 44 seconds East a distance of 167.14 feet to a point, said point
649 being on the northern Right of Way of Milstead Ave and the southern Right of Way of
650 Old Milstead Rd; Thence North 62 degrees 18 minutes 50 seconds East a distance of
H. B. 404
- 25 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
651 84.13 feet to a point; Thence North 61 degrees 10 minutes 11 seconds East a distance of
652 89.83 feet to a point, said point being on the northern Right of Way of Milstead Ave and
653 the northeastern Right of Way of Old Milstead Rd; Thence North 60 degrees 14 minutes
654 28 seconds East a distance of 20.63 feet to a point; Thence North 88 degrees 36 minutes
655 20 seconds East a distance of 237.95 feet to a point, said point being on the easterly Right
656 of Way of Milstead Ave (100' R/W); Thence North 85 degrees 18 minutes 04 seconds
657 East a distance of 179.20 feet to a point; Thence North 85 degrees 10 minutes 11 seconds
658 East a distance of 202.48 feet to a point; Thence North 79 degrees 44 minutes 40 seconds
659 East a distance of 56.06 feet to a point; Thence North 77 degrees 31 minutes 24 seconds
660 East a distance of 237.87 feet to a point; Thence North 76 degrees 54 minutes 46 seconds
661 East a distance of 221.43 feet to a point, said point being on the northern Right of Way
662 of Milstead Rd (50' R/W); Thence leaving said Right of Way South 13 degrees 11
663 minutes 47 seconds East a distance of 50.00 feet to a point, said point being on the
664 southern Right of Way of Milstead Rd (50' R/W); Thence South 77 degrees 03 minutes
665 59 seconds West a distance of 353.27 feet to a point; Thence South 77 degrees 46
666 minutes 27 seconds West a distance of 106.72 feet to a point, said point being on the
667 southern Right of Way of Milstead Rd (50' R/W) and the eastern Right of Way of
668 Wellbrook Cir; Thence leaving said Right of Way South 80 degrees 55 minutes 27
669 seconds West a distance of 77.72 feet to a point, said point being on the southern Right
670 of Way of Milstead Rd (50' R/W) and the eastern Right of Way of Wellbrook Cir; Thence
671 South 85 degrees 14 minutes 51 seconds West a distance of 11.95 feet; Thence South 85
672 degrees 10 minutes 04 seconds West a distance of 163.46 feet to a point; Thence South
673 85 degrees 14 minutes 15 seconds West a distance of 98.40 feet to a point; Thence South
674 85 degrees 20 minutes 57 seconds West a distance of 122.34 feet to a point; Thence
675 South 85 degrees 39 minutes 57 seconds West a distance of 37.58 feet to a point; Thence
676 North 89 degrees 14 minutes 28 seconds West a distance of 62.64 feet to the TRUE
677 POINT OF BEGINNING.
H. B. 404
- 26 -

25 LC 47 3230/AP
678 Said area contains 3.99 Acres/173,978 SF.
679 Tract 2 -Milstead Rd
680 ALL THAT TRACT or parcel of land lying and being in Land Lots 302 & 318 of the
681 16th District of Rockdale County, Georgia and being more particularly described as
682 follows:
683 Beginning at a point on the southerly Right of Way of Milstead Rd (50' R/W) and the
684 western Right of Way of Norton Rd; Thence leaving said Right of Way continue North
685 02 degrees 15 minutes 35 seconds East a distance of 68.27 feet to a point, said point
686 being on the northerly Right of Way of Milstead Rd (50' R/W); Thence North 77 degrees
687 25 minutes 54 seconds East a distance of 49.12 feet to a point; Thence North 77 degrees
688 42 minutes 41 seconds East a distance of 56.55 feet to a point, said point being on the
689 northerly Right of Way of Milstead Rd (50' R/W); Thence leaving said Right of Way
690 South 74 degrees 32 minutes 10 seconds East a distance of 108.94 feet to a point, said
691 point being on the southerly Right of Way of Milstead Rd (50' R/W); Thence South 76
692 degrees 23 minutes 49 seconds West a distance of 19.26 feet to a point; Thence South 78
693 degrees 55 minutes 16 seconds West a distance of 55.89 feet to a point; Thence South 77
694 degrees 42 minutes 14 seconds West a distance of 87.06 feet, said point being on the
695 southerly Right of Way of Milstead Rd (50' R/W) and the eastern Right of Way of Norton
696 Rd; Thence South 61 degrees 44 minutes 44 seconds West a distance of 59.32 feet to the
697 TRUE POINT OF BEGINNING.
698 Said area contains 0.19 Acres/8,455 SF."
699 SECTION 2.
700 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 404
- 27 -